hu: Internetrádió-formátum: Komponens adapter; Hi-Fi tuner (rack); Mikrorendszer; Hordozható; Asztali; Szekrény alatti; Egyéb
pt-PT: Formato do rádio de internet: Adaptador de componente; Sintonizador Hi-Fi (rack); Micro sistema; Portáteis; Tampo de mesa; Sob armário; Outro
da: Internetradioens formfaktor: Komponentadapter; Hi-Fi tuner (rack); Mikrosystem; Transportabel; Bordplade; Under-skab; Andet
en: Internet radio form factor: Component adapter; Hi-Fi tuner (rack); Micro system; Portable; Tabletop; Under-cabinet; Other
el: Μορφή ραδιοφώνου διαδικτύου: Προσαρμογέας εξαρτήματος; Δέκτης Hi-Fi (rack); Μικροσύστημα; Φορητό; Επιτραπέζια; Κάτω από ντουλάπι; Άλλο
sk-SK: Formát internetového rádia: Komponentový adaptér; Hi-Fi tuner (rack); Mikro systém; Prenosný; Stolový; Pod skrinku; Iné
zh-CN: 网络收音机外形: 组件适配器; Hi-Fi 调谐器（机架式）; 微型系统; 便携式; 桌面; 橱下式; 其他
tr: İnternet radyosu form faktörü: Bileşen adaptörü; Hi-Fi tuner (rack); Mikro sistem; Taşınabilir; Masaüstü; Dolap altı; Diğer
lt-LT: Interneto radijo formos faktorius: Komponentų adapteris; Hi-Fi imtuvas (stelažas); Mikrosistema; Nešiojama; Stalinis; Po spintelėmis; Kita
ja: インターネットラジオフォームファクター: コンポーネントアダプター; Hi-Fi チューナー（ラック）; マイクロシステム; ポータブル; 卓上; キャビネット下; その他
ko: 인터넷 라디오 폼 팩터: 컴포넌트 어댑터; 하이파이 튜너 (랙형); 마이크로 시스템; 이동식; 테이블탑; 언더캐비닛형; 기타
nl: Internetradio vormfactor: Component adapter; Hi-Fi tuner (rack); Microsysteem; Draagbaar; Tafelblad; Onderkast; Andere
cs: Provedení internetového rádia: Komponentový adaptér; Hi-Fi tuner (rack); Mikrosystém; Přenosné; Deska stolu; Pod skříňku; Jiné
sl-SI: Oblika internetnega radia: Adapter komponente; Hi-Fi tuner (stenski nosilec); Mikro sistem; Prenosno; Namizni; Pod omaro; Drugo
de: Bauform des Internetradios: Komponentenadapter; HiFi-Tuner (Rack); Mikrosystem; Tragbar; Tischgerät; Unterschrank; Sonstiges
nb: Internettradio formfaktor: Komponentadapter; Hi-Fi tuner (rack); Mikrosystem; Bærbar; Bordplate; Under skap; Annet
es: Factor de forma de la radio por internet: Adaptador de componente; Sintonizador Hi-Fi (rack); Microsistema; Portátil; Sobremesa; Bajo gabinete; Otros
bg-BG: Типоразмер на интернет радио: Компонентен адаптер; Hi-Fi тунер (рак); Микро система; Преносима; Плот за маса; Под шкаф; Други
vi: Kiểu dáng radio internet: Bộ chuyển đổi thành phần; Bộ dò Hi-Fi (rack); Hệ thống micro; Xách tay; Trên mặt bàn; Dưới tủ; Khác
th: รูปแบบของวิทยุอินเทอร์เน็ต: อะแดปเตอร์คอมโพเนนต์; จูนเนอร์ไฮไฟ (แร็ก); ระบบไมโคร; แบบพกพา; วางของได้; ติดใต้ตู้; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Fator de forma do rádio de internet: Adaptador de componente; Sintonizador Hi-Fi (rack); Micro sistema; Portátil; Tampo de mesa; Sob gabinete; Outro
ru: Формфактор интернет-радио: Компонентный адаптер; Hi-Fi тюнер (стоечный); Микросистема; Портативная; Настольный; Подшкафной; Другой
pl: Format radia internetowego: Adapter komponentowy; Tuner Hi-Fi (rack); Mikrosystem; Przenośny; Blat stołu; Podszafkowe; Inne
ro-RO: Factor de formă radio internet: Adaptor de componentă; Tuner Hi-Fi (rack); Micro sistem; Portabilă; Blat; Sub dulap; Altele
it: Fattore di forma della radio internet: Adattatore componente; Sintonizzatore Hi-Fi (rack); Microsistema; Portatile; Da tavolo; Sottopensile; Altro
fi: Internetradion muototekijä: Komponenttisovitin; Hi-Fi-viritin (teline); Mikrojärjestelmä; Siirrettävät; Pöydällä pidettävä; Kaapinalusmalli; Muu
zh-TW: 網路收音機外型規格: 組件轉接器; Hi-Fi 調諧器（機架式）; 微型音響系統; 可攜式; 桌上型; 櫥櫃下掛式; 其他
fr: Facteur de forme de la radio Internet: Adaptateur de composant; Tuner Hi-Fi (rack); Micro-système; Portable; De table; Sous-meuble; Autre
hr-HR: Oblik internetskog radija: Komponentni adapter; Hi-Fi tuner (rack); Mikro sustav; Prijenosni; Stolni; Ispod ormarića; Ostalo
sv: Internetradions formfaktor: Komponentadapter; Hi-Fi-tuner (rack); Mikrosystem; Bärbar; Bordsskiva; Under skåp; Övrigt